South Dakota, session 2026, SB197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-57-2 be AMENDED:
1-57-2. The South Dakota-Ireland Trade Commission consists of:
(1) Two members of the Senate, appointed by the president pro tempore of the
Senate;
(2) Two members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the
House;
(3) A representative of a private sector association headquartered in this state and
focused on the promotion of international trade, appointed by the Executive Board
of the Legislative Research Council;
(4) An officer of the Executive Branch, appointed by the Governor;
(5) A representative of a South Dakota private industry, appointed by the president
pro tempore of the Senate; and
(6) A representative of a South Dakota private industry, appointed by the speaker of
the House of Representatives.
Each term begins upon appointment in an odd-numbered year and expires on
December thirty-first of the following even-numbered year. If a position becomes vacant,
the position must be filled, for the duration of the term, in the same manner as the original
appointment.
Section 2. That § 1-57-3 be AMENDED:
1-57-3. The Executive Board of the Legislative Research Council shall provide
administrative services to the South Dakota-Ireland Trade Commission.

26.382.15 2 197
The commission shall select one legislator to serve as chair. The commission shall
meet at least once each year.
Section 3. That § 1-57-4 be AMENDED:
1-57-4. There is established in the state treasury the South Dakota-Ireland trade
fund for the purposes of defraying the administrative expenses of the commission and
supporting the commission's work in accordance with § 1-57-1. The Executive Board of
the Legislative Research Council shall administer the fund.
The fund consists of all moneys raised by or on behalf of the commission, together
with any gifts, grants, or other donations. Interest on moneys credited to the fund must
remain in the fund.
The South Dakota-Ireland trade fund is continuously appropriated to the South
Dakota-Ireland Trade Commission.
SB197 ENROLLED

26.382.15 3 197
An Act to modify the administration of the South Dakota-Ireland trade fund.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 197
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 197 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB197 ENROLLED